Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3905.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, chapter 35, article 2, section 9, is amended to read: Sec. 9. OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION $ 250,000 $ -0- Use of Force Training $250,000 the first year is to provide reimbursement grants to eligible postsecondary schools certified to provide programs of professional peace officer education for providing in-service training programs on the use of force, including deadly force, by peace officers. Of this amount, up to 2.5 percent is for administration and monitoring of the program.new text begin This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027.new text end To be eligible for reimbursement, training offered by a postsecondary school must: (1) satisfy the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 626.8452, and be approved by the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training; (2) utilize scenario-based training that simulates real-world situations and involves the use of real firearms that fire nonlethal ammunition; (3) include a block of instruction on the physical and psychological effects of stress before, during, and after a high-risk or traumatic incident and the cumulative impact of stress on the health of officers; (4) include blocks of instruction on de-escalation methods and tactics, bias motivation, unknown risk training, defensive tactics, and force-on-force training; and (5) be offered to peace officers at no charge to the peace officer or law enforcement agency. An eligible postsecondary school may apply for reimbursement for the costs of offering the training. Reimbursement shall be made at a rate of $450 for each officer who completes the training. The postsecondary school must submit the name and peace officer license number of the peace officer who received the training to the Office of Higher Education. As used in this section: (1) "law enforcement agency" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f); and (2) "peace officer" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c).